src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ============================= !
!! !!!File containing abbreviations 
! ============================= !

!! !!Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1  groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation   !!= * __@CODE@__
ITRAB ;	   !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
TRNUMAB ;  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)

!! !!The sublexica

!! !Dividing between abbreviations with and witout final period

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-dot-noun ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-nodot-adj ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
ab-nodot-num ;
ab-dot-num;

!! !The lexicons that add tags

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  The bulk
       +N+ABBR+Attr:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Nom:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Acc:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Gen:      # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:i   # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Loc:%>%:s   # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Com:%>%:in  # ; ! no period, that is.
        +N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n   # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill+Err/Orth:%>%:ii  # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Loc+Err/Orth:%>%:as  # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:ain # ;! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:iin # ;! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Ess+Err/Orth:%>%:an  # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Adv+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR: RHyph ;


LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
       +N+ABBR+Attr:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Nom:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Acc:%.%>      # ;
        +N+ABBR+Gen:%.%>      # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Ill:%.%>%:i   # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Loc:%.%>%:s   # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Com:%.%>%:in  # ;
!        +N+ABBR+Ess:%.%>%:n   # ;
!+N+ABBR+Ill+Err/Orth:%.%>%:ii  # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Loc+Err/Orth:%.%>%:as  # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%.%>%:ain # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Com+Err/Orth:%.%>%:iin # ; !
!+N+ABBR+Ess+Err/Orth:%.%>%:an  # ; !
!+N+ABBR:%. RHyph ;


LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ; ! Adv without case.

LEXICON ab-dot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
+Num+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ;
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-cc   !!= * __@CODE@__
+CC+ABBR:%.%> # ;


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__  A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
ab-dot-verb ;
ab-nodot-verb ;
ab-dot-IVprfprc ;

LEXICON ab-dot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%> # ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%> # ; ! No period.
! # ;

! riegádan:

LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc   !!= * __@CODE@__
+V+ABBR+IV+PrfPrc:%.%> # ; ! Period.

LEXICON SYMBOLconnector   !!= * __@CODE@__
  +Attr+Use/Circ:   K ; ! §
  +Sg+Nom+Use/Circ:   K ; ! §
!          +Sg+Gen:   K ; ! §
!          +Sg+Acc:   K ; ! §
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:   SYMBOLsuff ; ! §as
         +Use/Circ:%: SYMBOLsuff ; ! §:s
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%- SYMBOLsuff ; ! §-as ! Perhaps.
 +Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%' SYMBOLsuff ; ! §'as ! Perhaps.

LEXICON SYMBOLsuff   !!= * __@CODE@__
!                       K ; ! § 14 (no case on the bare §). Oh, yes. Case.
         +Sg+Gen:       K ;	! §    (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
         +Sg+Acc:       K ;	!       suffix)
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a      K ;	! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:a      K ;	!       suffix)
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij     K ;
         +Sg+Ill:i      K ;
         +Sg+Loc:s      K ;  ! §:s
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as     K ;  ! §:as
         +Sg+Com:in     K ;
            +Ess:n      K ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:an     K ;
         +Pl+Nom:t      K ;
         +Pl+Gen:id     K ;
         +Pl+Acc:id     K ;
         +Pl+Ill:ide    K ;
         +Pl+Loc:in     K ;
         +Pl+Com:igujn  K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:at     K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ajde   K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ajn    K ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ajgujn K ;



!! !!The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols
! -------------------------------------------

LEXICON SYMBOLS   !!= * __@CODE@__ is for iscellaneous abbr symbols
 §+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§  SYMBOLconnector ; ! §:s
§§+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§§ SYMBOLconnector ; !§§:ain
 $+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:$  SYMBOLconnector ; ! $:s
 €+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:€  SYMBOLconnector ; ! €:s
 £+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:£  SYMBOLconnector ; ! £:s
 ®+N+ABBR:® # ;
 ©+N+ABBR:© # ;


! =============================================== !
! Intransitive abbreviations 
! =============================================== !

LEXICON ITRAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ are intransitive abbreviations, A.S. etc.

! List the beginning of the alphabet, !
! in order to account for numbering !
! of paragraphs etc. !

1p+Use/Circ:1p ab-noun; ! !
2p+Use/Circ:2p ab-noun; ! !
3p+Use/Circ:3p ab-noun; ! !


A.L ab-dot-noun ;
A.S ab-dot-noun ;
Dep:Dep9 ab-noun ;



! ============================================================ !
! Abbreviations that are not treated as abbreviations !
! at the end of the sentence !
! ============================================================ !

LEXICON NOAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ du, gen, jur

!! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive
!! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
!! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
!! the sentnece (when next word has small letters) can be 
!! considered as true cases.

du ab-dot-noun ; !dualis
gen ab-dot-noun ; ! genitiivi
jur ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš !



! ============================================================ !
! Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 
! ============================================================ !

LEXICON TRAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains transitive abbreviations
1.aman+Use/Circ:1.aman ab-dot-noun; ! !1.amanuensis
A:A ab-dot-noun;
B:B ab-dot-noun;
C:C ab-dot-noun;
D:D ab-dot-noun;
E:E ab-dot-noun;
F:F ab-dot-noun;
G:G ab-dot-noun;
H:H ab-dot-noun;
I:I ab-dot-noun;
J:J ab-dot-noun;
K:K ab-dot-noun;
L:L ab-dot-noun;
M:M ab-dot-noun;
N:N ab-dot-noun;
O:O ab-dot-noun;
P:P ab-dot-noun;
Q:Q ab-dot-noun;
R:R ab-dot-noun;
S:S ab-dot-noun;
T:T ab-dot-noun;
U:U ab-dot-noun;
V:V ab-dot-noun;
W:W ab-dot-noun;
X:X ab-dot-noun;
Y:Y ab-dot-noun;
Z:Z ab-dot-noun;
Æ:Æ ab-dot-noun;
Ø:Ø ab-dot-noun;
Å:Å ab-dot-noun;
Ä:Ä ab-dot-noun;
Ö:Ö ab-dot-noun;
Č:Č ab-dot-noun;
Š:Š ab-dot-noun;
Ž:Ž ab-dot-noun;
Ŧ:Ŧ ab-dot-noun;
Đ:Đ ab-dot-noun;
Ŋ:Ŋ ab-dot-noun;
Á:Á ab-dot-noun;
ž:ž ab-nodot-noun;
á:á ab-nodot-noun;
ŋ:ŋ ab-nodot-noun;
đ:đ ab-nodot-noun;
ŧ:ŧ ab-nodot-noun;
a:a ab-nodot-noun; !
c:c ab-nodot-noun; !
d:d ab-nodot-noun; !
e:e ab-nodot-noun; !
f:f ab-nodot-noun; !
g:g ab-nodot-noun; !
h:h ab-nodot-noun; !
i:i ab-nodot-noun; !
j:j ab-nodot-noun; !
k:k ab-nodot-noun; !
l:l ab-nodot-noun; !
m:m ab-nodot-noun; !
n:n ab-nodot-noun; !
o:o ab-nodot-noun; !mysko
p:p ab-nodot-noun; !
q:q ab-nodot-noun; !
r:r ab-nodot-noun; !
s:s ab-nodot-noun; !
t:t ab-nodot-noun; !
u:u ab-nodot-noun; !
v:v ab-nodot-noun; !
w:w ab-nodot-noun; !
x:x ab-nodot-noun; !
y:y ab-nodot-noun; !
z:z ab-nodot-noun; !
æ:æ ab-nodot-noun; !
ø:ø ab-nodot-noun; !
å:å ab-nodot-noun; !
ä:ä ab-nodot-noun; !
ö:ö ab-nodot-noun; !
č:č ab-nodot-noun; !
š:š ab-nodot-noun; !
ž:ž ab-dot-noun;
á:á ab-dot-noun;
ŋ:ŋ ab-dot-noun;
đ:đ ab-dot-noun;
ŧ:ŧ ab-dot-noun;
a:a ab-dot-noun; !
c:c ab-dot-noun; !
d:d ab-dot-noun; !
e:e ab-dot-noun; !
f:f ab-dot-noun; !
g:g ab-dot-noun; !
h:h ab-dot-noun; !
i:i ab-dot-noun; !
j:j ab-dot-noun; !
k:k ab-dot-noun; !
l:l ab-dot-noun; !
m:m ab-dot-noun; !
n:n ab-dot-noun; !
o:o ab-dot-noun; !
p:p ab-dot-noun; !
q:q ab-dot-noun; !
r:r ab-dot-noun; !
s:s ab-dot-noun; !
t:t ab-dot-noun; !
u:u ab-dot-noun; !
v:v ab-dot-noun; !
w:w ab-dot-noun; !
x:x ab-dot-noun; !
y:y ab-dot-noun; !
z:z ab-dot-noun; !
æ:æ ab-dot-noun; !
ø:ø ab-dot-noun; !
å:å ab-dot-noun; !
ä:ä ab-dot-noun; !
ö:ö ab-dot-noun; !
č:č ab-dot-noun; !
š:š ab-dot-noun; !
